District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

3-3502

Establishment of Commission for Men.

Expired.

History

Feb. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-72, § 3, 40 DCR 7585

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3902.

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 10-72

See note to § 3-3501.